Utah statutes.
72-2-123.   Rules adopting guidelines -- Partnering to finance state highway capacity improvements -- Partnering proposals.

(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission, in consultation with representatives of local government, shall make rules adopting guidelines for partnering with counties and municipalities for their help to finance state highway improvement projects through:

(a)  local matching dollars; or

(b)  other local participation methods.

(2)  The guidelines shall encourage partnering to help finance state highway improvement projects and provide for:

(a)  consideration of factors relevant to a decision to make a program adjustment including the potential to:

(i)  extend department resources to other needed projects;

(ii)  alleviate significant existing or future congestion or hazards to the traveling public; and

(iii)  address a need that is widely recognized by the public, elected officials, and transportation planners;

(b)  a process for submitting, evaluating, and hearing partnering proposals; and

(c)  keeping a public record of each proposal from initial submission to final disposition.

(3)  The commission shall submit the proposed rules under this section to a committee or task force designated by the Legislative Management Committee for review prior to taking final action on the proposed rules or any proposed amendment to the rules.

